Massachusetts, session 194th, H2981.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word "Authority;" in line 297 the 
following:- "employees of the Executive Office of Public Safety and Security - Military Division 
working as Installation Security Officers;"